Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1000.20, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1000.20. Sections 1000.20 through 1000.29 1000.30 of
this title shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Uniform
Building Code Commission Act".
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1000.21, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1000.21. A. 1. There is hereby created the Oklahoma
Uniform Building Code Commission within the Construction Industries

Board which shall consist of thirteen (13) members, eleven of whom
shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of
the Senate as follows:
a. one member who is a general contractor from a
statewide organization that represents residential
construction,
b. one member who is a general contractor from a
statewide organization that represents commercial
construction,
c. one member who is a contractor from a statewide
organization that represents electrical contractors,
d. one member who is a contractor from a statewide
organization that represents plumbing contractors,
e. one member who is a contractor from a statewide
organization that represents heating and cooling
contractors,
f. one member who is a licensed electrical engineer from
a state-recognized professional engineering firm,
g. one member who is a local-level regulator/inspector
who is a member of a statewide organization that is
exempt from taxation under federal law and designated
pursuant to the provisions of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 170(a),
who has represented municipalities and had statutory
functions for municipalities for at least fifteen (15)
ten (10) years prior to November 1, 2005,
h. one member who is a Certified Building Official
certified building official employed by a political
subdivision,
i. one member who is a licensed architect from a
statewide organization that represents architects,
j. one member who is from the insurance industry with
knowledge of building codes and experience in property
loss mitigation, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 2085 Page 2

k. one member who is a licensed mechanical engineer from
a state-recognized professional engineering firm.
2. The members shall be appointed for staggered terms of four
(4) years. The initial appointment of the members added by this act
shall be made within ninety (90) days of the effective date of this
act. A full term of office for purposes of determining term limits
provided in subsection C of this section shall be the completion of
a full four-year term of appointment.
B. The remaining two members of the Commission shall be the
State Fire Marshal, or a designee, and an appointee of the
Construction Industries Board.
C. Appointed members shall continue in office until a successor
is appointed by the Governor, notwithstanding the term limitations.
No appointed member shall serve more than two consecutive full four-
year terms; provided, such a member shall be eligible to serve until
a successor is appointed, and such member may be reappointed after a
two-year absence from the Commission. The Governor shall fill all
vacancies and unexpired terms in the same manner as the original
appointment of the member whose position is to be filled. No
initial appointment to a term of less than four (4) years or any
partial-term appointment to fill a vacancy or unexpired term of
another member shall be counted for purposes of determining term
limits. An appointed member may be removed by the Governor for
cause.
D. Whenever a member of the Commission is absent from more than
one-half (1/2) of all meetings of the governing body, regular and
special, held within any period of twelve (12) consecutive months,
the member shall thereupon cease to hold office by operation of law.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1000.23, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1000.23. A. The Oklahoma Uniform Building Code
Commission shall have the power and the duty to review and adopt all
building codes and standards for residential and commercial
construction to be used by all entities within this state. Codes
and standards adopted by the Commission shall be the minimum
standards for residential and commercial construction in this state.
B. All public projects shall abide by such minimum standards
and requirements; provided, nothing in the Oklahoma Uniform Building
ENR. H. B. NO. 2085 Page 3

Code Commission Act shall prevent or take away from state agencies
the authority to enact and enforce requirements containing higher
standards and requirements than such minimum standards and
requirements.
C. Municipalities and other political subdivisions shall abide
by such minimum standards and requirements; provided, nothing in the
Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission Act shall prevent or take
away from such municipalities and other political subdivisions the
authority to enact and enforce requirements containing higher
standards and requirements than such minimum standards and
requirements.
D. The Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission shall have the
power and duty to establish a continuing education and training and
certification process for all residential and commercial building
construction industry personnel affected by the codes adopted by the
Commission, including, but not limited to, code inspectors
officials, design professionals, and trade workers. The Commission
shall establish regional training for the purpose of training the
county and municipal inspectors in the Uniform Building Code. The
regional training shall be offered at no cost to the participant
state-licensed building code officials and shall be funded from the
funds received pursuant to Section 1000.25 of this title. A fee may
be assessed to all participants other than state-licensed code
officials. When assessed, the fee shall be limited to any cost
directly associated with the training and shall be remitted to the
State Treasury pursuant to the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code
Commission Act. Such fees shall be deposited in the Oklahoma
Uniform Building Code Commission Revolving Fund and shall be used
solely for the purposes of the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code
Commission Act. Each inspector code official operating in this
state on behalf of any state agency or any municipal or county
office may complete regional training and be issued a certification
for inspections certificate of completion by the Oklahoma Uniform
Building Code Commission on and after January 1, 2015. The training
and certification applications, qualifications and procedures shall
be promulgated by rules of the Commission. The Commission may
establish forms and procedures to implement and administer the
provisions of this section.
E. The Commission shall establish a workforce development
process with the purpose of increasing the number of available code
officials in Oklahoma. The Commission shall promulgate rules on the
workforce development applications, qualifications, forms, and
ENR. H. B. NO. 2085 Page 4

procedures to implement and administer the provisions of this
section.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1000.25, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1000.25. A. The Oklahoma Uniform Building Code
Commission shall establish a system of fees to be charged for the
issuance and renewal of any construction permits issued by any
agency, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state.
B. This provision is subject to the following limitations:
1. No schedule of fees may be established or amended by the
Commission except during such times as the Legislature is in
session; provided, the Commission may establish or amend a schedule
of fees at a time when the Legislature is not in session if the fees
or schedule of fees has been specifically authorized by the
Legislature pursuant to paragraphs 2 3 and 3 4 of this subsection.
The Commission must follow the procedures required by Article I of
the Administrative Procedures Act for adoption of rules in
establishing or amending any such schedule of fees;
2. The Commission shall charge fees for building construction
permits and renewal of such permits issued by any state agency,
municipality, or other political subdivision of this state which
authorized work governed by codes within the purview of the
Commission only within the following ranges:
For
a. for issuance of permit not to exceed $5.00
For
b. for renewal of permit not to exceed $5.00
3. Fees shall be remitted to the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code
Commission within thirty (30) days after the end of the preceding
calendar month. The Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission shall
report electronically to the Governor, President Pro Tempore of the
Senate and the Speaker of the House semiannually its collections for
the six (6) months preceding the report;
ENR. H. B. NO. 2085 Page 5

3. 4. Fees shall be collected by any state agency, municipality
or other political subdivision issuing construction permits within
this state. The fees shall be deposited in an account created by
the collecting entity for that purpose;
4. 5. The state agency, municipality or other political
subdivision shall remit the monies in the account on a monthly basis
directly to the State Treasury for deposit in the Oklahoma Uniform
Building Code Commission Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section
1000.28 of this title. Along with the deposits required by this
paragraph, each state agency, municipality or other political
subdivision shall also submit a report stating the total amount of
funds collected and the total number of fees imposed during the
preceding month. The report shall be made on computerized or manual
disposition reports as provided by rule of the Commission;
5. 6. Any state agency, municipality or other political
subdivision collecting and remitting fees pursuant to this section
may levy a fee up to fifty cents ($0.50) for every construction
permit or renewal permit issued. These monies shall be deposited
into an account for the sole use of the state agency, municipality
or other political subdivision. The state agency, municipality or
other political subdivision shall state the total amount of funds
collected and the total number of fees imposed to the State Treasury
in the report required by paragraph 4 5 of this subsection;
6. 7. It shall be the responsibility of the state agency,
municipality or other political subdivision to account for and
ensure the correctness and accuracy of payments made to the State
Treasury pursuant to this title;
7. 8. Funds collected by a state agency, municipality or other
political subdivision and remitted to the State Treasury pursuant to
the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission Act shall be deposited
in the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission Revolving Fund and
shall be used solely for the purposes of the Oklahoma Uniform
Building Code Commission Act; and
8. 9. Nothing in this act the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code
Commission Act shall prevent the Oklahoma Uniform Building Code
Commission from offering incentives for prompt payment.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2085 Page 6

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2085 Page 7